New Jersey, session 221, S3065.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 1 of P.L.1995, c.231 (C.52:27D-310.1) is amended to read as follows: 1.    When computing a municipal adjustment regarding available land resources as part of the determination of a municipality's fair share of affordable housing, the [Council on Affordable Housing] following shall [exclude] be excluded from [designating] designation as vacant land: (a)   any land that is owned by a local government entity that as of January 1, 1997, has adopted, prior to the institution of a lawsuit seeking a builder's remedy or prior to the filing of a petition for substantive certification of a housing element and fair share plan, a resolution authorizing an execution of agreement that the land be utilized for a public purpose other than housing; (b)   any land listed on a master plan of a municipality as being dedicated, by easement or otherwise, for purposes of conservation, park lands or open space and which is owned, leased, licensed, or in any manner operated by a county, municipality or tax-exempt, nonprofit organization including a local board of education, or by more than one municipality by joint agreement pursuant to P.L.1964, c.185 (C.40:61-35.1 et seq.), for so long as the entity maintains such ownership, lease, license, or operational control of such land; (c)   any vacant contiguous parcels of land in private ownership of a size which would accommodate fewer than five housing units [if current standards of the council were applied] based on appropriate standards pertaining to housing density; (d)   historic and architecturally important sites listed on the State Register of Historic Places or National Register of Historic Places prior to the submission of the petition of substantive certification; (e)   agricultural lands when the development rights to these lands have been purchased or restricted by covenant; (f)   sites designated for active recreation that are designated for recreational purposes in the municipal master plan; and (g)   environmentally sensitive lands where development is [prohibited] regulated by any State or federal agency, including, but not limited to, the Highlands Water Protection and Planning Council, established pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-4), for lands in the Highlands Preservation Area, and lands in the Highlands Planning Area for Highlands-conforming municipalities, or regulated pursuant to the "Flood Hazard Area Control Act," P.L.1962, c.19 (C.58:16A-50 et seq.) or the "Freshwater Wetlands Protection Act," P.L.1987, c.156 (C.13:9B-1 et seq.). No municipality shall be required to utilize for affordable housing purposes land that is excluded from being designated as vacant land. (cf: P.L.2008, c.46, s.39) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.